District of Columbia statutes.
29-702.06

Liability for inaccurate information in filed record.

(a)

If a record delivered to the Mayor for filing under this chapter and filed by the Mayor contains inaccurate information, a person that suffers loss by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from:

(1)

A person that signed the record, or caused another to sign it on the person’s behalf, and knew the information to be inaccurate at the time the record was signed; and

(2)

A general partner that has notice that the information was inaccurate when the record was filed or has become inaccurate because of changed circumstances, if the general partner has notice for a reasonably sufficient time before the information is relied upon to enable the general partner to effect an amendment under § 29-702.02, file a petition pursuant to § 29-702.05, or deliver to the Mayor for filing a statement of change pursuant to § 29-104.07 or a statement of correction pursuant to § 29-102.05.

(b)

Signing a record authorized or required to be filed under this chapter shall constitute an affirmation under the penalties of making false statements that the facts stated in the record are true.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(3)(D), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “inaccurate” for “false” in (a) and in the section heading; and substituted “making false statements” for “perjury” in (b).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 208 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.